Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.810

Expanded eligibility—Registered apprenticeships.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) An applicant or consumer is eligible to receive working connections child care benefits for the care of one or more eligible children for the first 12 months of the applicant's or consumer's enrollment in a state registered apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW when:

(a) The applicant or consumer's household annual income adjusted for family size does not exceed 75 percent of the state median income at the time of application, or, beginning July 1, 2027, does not exceed 85 percent of the state median income if funds are appropriated for the purpose of RCW 43.216.802(4);

(b) The child receiving care is: (i) Less than 13 years of age; or (ii) less than 19 years of age and either has a verified special need according to department rule or is under court supervision; and

(c) The household meets all other program eligibility requirements established in this chapter or in rule by the department in accordance with RCW 43.216.055, 43.216.065, and 43.216.800.

(2) The department must adopt a copayment model for benefits granted under this subsection [section], which must align with any copayment identified or adopted for households with the same income level under RCW 43.216.804.

[ 2024 c 67 s 6.]